New York, session 2025-2026, A11097.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 2403 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by chapter 402 of the laws of 1986, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. Public lands other than highways. No person, except (a) persons 5 that are certified handicapped individuals, or (b) persons who have 6 attained the age of seventy and hold a valid senior game recovery permit 7 issued by the department of environmental conservation, shall operate an 8 ATV on any public lands, waters and property other than a highway, 9 except that an ATV may be operated on any such lands which have been 10 designated and posted for travel by ATVs in accordance with the 11 provisions of section twenty-four hundred five of this article. Persons 12 certified as handicapped individuals may utilize an ATV to enter and 13 exit public lands for the purpose of hunting, whereby such individual 14 may be the operator or a passenger of such vehicle. Persons who have 15 attained the age of seventy and hold a senior game recovery permit may 16 operate an ATV on public lands during an open big game hunting season, 17 for the sole purpose of retrieving a lawfully taken big game animal, 18 whereby such senior permittee may be the operator or a passenger of the 19 ATV for such retrieval purpose. 20 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 21 section 11-0936 to read as follows: 22 § 11-0936. Senior game recovery permit for all-terrain vehicle use. 23 1. The department is authorized and directed to establish a senior 24 game recovery permit program, allowing limited all-terrain vehicle use 25 on state-owned lands for the purpose of retrieving big game by senior 26 hunters. A person who has attained the age of seventy years may apply to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14284-01-5 A. 11097 2 1 the department for a senior game recovery permit. The applicant shall be 2 a New York state resident and shall meet any additional criteria set by 3 the department pursuant to subdivision three of this section. 4 2. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the rules and regu- 5 lations of the department, or any other law to the contrary, a holder of 6 a valid senior game recovery permit may operate or have operated an 7 all-terrain vehicle for the sole purpose of retrieving lawfully taken 8 big game animals, as defined in section 11-0103 of this article, from 9 lands under the jurisdiction of the department, subject to the following 10 provisions: 11 a. Such operation of an all-terrain vehicle shall only be permitted 12 during an open big game hunting season and only in an area where the 13 permittee is lawfully engaged in big game hunting; 14 b. The permittee shall carry the permit on their person at all times 15 during any all-terrain vehicle operation authorized by this section and 16 shall produce it upon request by an enforcement officer; 17 c. Any all-terrain vehicle use pursuant to the permit is done in 18 compliance with department regulations and guidelines aimed at minimiz- 19 ing environmental impact, including but not limited to restrictions on 20 the specific trails or routes that may be used for retrieval, time-of- 21 day limitations, or requirements to obtain site-specific authorization 22 from a forest ranger or land manager if deemed necessary; 23 d. No firearms or crossbows on or within the all-terrain vehicle shall 24 be loaded or cocked during the retrieval process, consistent with the 25 provisions of section 11-0931 of this title, unless the permittee 26 possesses a separate valid non-ambulatory hunter permit issued pursuant 27 to section 11-0931 of this title allowing such possession; 28 e. The all-terrain vehicle operated pursuant to the permit shall be 29 duly registered and in compliance with the provisions of article forty- 30 eight-C of the vehicle and traffic law, unless such all-terrain vehicle 31 qualifies as exempt from registration under such article, and the opera- 32 tor of such all-terrain vehicle shall hold a valid driver's license or 33 all-terrain vehicle safety certificate if required by law; and 34 f. The permittee shall adhere to any other conditions the department 35 may require as part of the permit. 36 3. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement 37 the provisions of this section. Such rules may include, but shall not be 38 limited to, the application process and documentation required, such as 39 proof of age and residency, or a physician's statement attesting to any 40 mobility impairment if the department deems it appropriate to require 41 such documentation, and the duration and renewal of permits, revocation 42 of permits for misuse, and specific limitations on all-terrain vehicle 43 use for game retrieval on different categories of state lands. In devel- 44 oping such rules, the department shall consider both the needs of senior 45 hunters for reasonable access and the potential impacts on natural 46 resources, and shall consult with stakeholder groups as appropriate. 47 4. A senior game recovery permit shall not be transferable and may be 48 used only by the individual to whom it was issued. The permittee may be 49 accompanied by a helper to assist in operating the all-terrain vehicle 50 or loading the game, and such helper shall be authorized to operate the 51 all-terrain vehicle in the presence of the permittee for the retrieval 52 purpose. 53 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize recreation- 54 al all-terrain vehicle riding on state lands or any use of an all-ter- 55 rain vehicle contrary to other provisions of law, except as explicitly 56 allowed herein for big game retrieval. All use of all-terrain vehicles A. 11097 3 1 under the senior game recovery permit program shall be conducted in a 2 manner that preserves public safety and the integrity of state lands. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 5 ment, and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the imple- 6 mentation of this act on its effective date are authorized and directed 7 to be made and completed by the department of environmental conservation 8 on or before such effective date.